src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Va orlar órlan/XxV1V2 orlar
SFX Va ormar órmes/XxV7V8 ormar
SFX Va ormar órma/XxV1V2 ormar
SFX Va ormar órmen/XxV1V2 ormar
SFX Va ormar órman/XxV1V2 ormar
SFX Va ormiar órmies/XxV7V8 ormiar
SFX Va ormiar órmia/XxV1V2 ormiar
SFX Va ormiar órmien/XxV1V2 ormiar
SFX Va ormiar órmian/XxV1V2 ormiar
SFX Va ornar órnes/XxV7V8 ornar
SFX Va ornar órna/XxV1V2 ornar
SFX Va ornar órnen/XxV1V2 ornar
SFX Va ornar órnan/XxV1V2 ornar
SFX Va orniar órnies/XxV7V8 orniar
SFX Va orniar órnia/XxV1V2 orniar
SFX Va orniar órnien/XxV1V2 orniar
SFX Va orniar órnian/XxV1V2 orniar
SFX Va orpar órpes/XxV7V8 orpar
SFX Va orpar órpa/XxV1V2 orpar
SFX Va orpar órpen/XxV1V2 orpar
SFX Va orpar órpan/XxV1V2 orpar
SFX Va orpiar órpies/XxV7V8 orpiar
SFX Va orpiar órpia/XxV1V2 orpiar
SFX Va orpiar órpien/XxV1V2 orpiar
SFX Va orpiar órpian/XxV1V2 orpiar
SFX Va orrar órres/XxV7V8 orrar
SFX Va orrar órra/XxV1V2 orrar
SFX Va orrar órren/XxV1V2 orrar
SFX Va orrar órran/XxV1V2 orrar
SFX Va orriar órries/XxV7V8 orriar
SFX Va orriar órria/XxV1V2 orriar
SFX Va orriar órrien/XxV1V2 orriar
SFX Va orriar órrian/XxV1V2 orriar
SFX Va ortar órtes/XxV7V8 ortar
SFX Va ortar órta/XxV1V2 ortar
SFX Va ortar órten/XxV1V2 ortar
SFX Va ortar órtan/XxV1V2 ortar
SFX Va ortiar órties/XxV7V8 ortiar
SFX Va ortiar órtia/XxV1V2 ortiar
SFX Va ortiar órtien/XxV1V2 ortiar
SFX Va ortiar órtian/XxV1V2 ortiar
SFX Va orvar órves/XxV7V8 orvar
SFX Va orvar órva/XxV1V2 orvar
SFX Va orvar órven/XxV1V2 orvar
SFX Va orvar órvan/XxV1V2 orvar
SFX Va orviar órvies/XxV7V8 orviar
SFX Va orviar órvia/XxV1V2 orviar
SFX Va orviar órvien/XxV1V2 orviar
SFX Va orviar órvian/XxV1V2 orviar
SFX Va orxar órxes/XxV7V8 orxar
SFX Va orxar órxa/XxV1V2 orxar
SFX Va orxar órxen/XxV1V2 orxar
SFX Va orxar órxan/XxV1V2 orxar
SFX Va orzar órces/XxV7V8 orzar
SFX Va orzar órza/XxV1V2 orzar
SFX Va orzar órcen/XxV1V2 orzar
SFX Va orzar órzan/XxV1V2 orzar
SFX Va osar óses/XxV7V8 osar
SFX Va osar ósa/XxV1V2 osar
SFX Va osar ósen/XxV1V2 osar
SFX Va osar ósan/XxV1V2 osar
SFX Va oscar ósques/XxV7V8 oscar
SFX Va oscar ósca/XxV1V2 oscar
SFX Va oscar ósquen/XxV1V2 oscar
SFX Va oscar óscan/XxV1V2 oscar
SFX Va osiar ósies/XxV7V8 osiar
SFX Va osiar ósia/XxV1V2 osiar
SFX Va osiar ósien/XxV1V2 osiar
SFX Va osiar ósian/XxV1V2 osiar
SFX Va osmar ósmes/XxV7V8 osmar
SFX Va osmar ósma/XxV1V2 osmar
SFX Va osmar ósmen/XxV1V2 osmar
SFX Va osmar ósman/XxV1V2 osmar
SFX Va osnar ósnes/XxV7V8 osnar
SFX Va osnar ósna/XxV1V2 osnar
SFX Va osnar ósnen/XxV1V2 osnar
SFX Va osnar ósnan/XxV1V2 osnar
SFX Va ospiar óspies/XxV7V8 ospiar
SFX Va ospiar óspia/XxV1V2 ospiar
SFX Va ospiar óspien/XxV1V2 ospiar
SFX Va ospiar óspian/XxV1V2 ospiar
SFX Va ostar óstes/XxV7V8 ostar
SFX Va ostar ósta/XxV1V2 ostar
SFX Va ostar ósten/XxV1V2 ostar
SFX Va ostar óstan/XxV1V2 ostar
SFX Va ostiar ósties/XxV7V8 ostiar
SFX Va ostiar óstia/XxV1V2 ostiar
SFX Va ostiar óstien/XxV1V2 ostiar
SFX Va ostiar óstian/XxV1V2 ostiar
SFX Va ostrar óstres/XxV7V8 ostrar
SFX Va ostrar óstra/XxV1V2 ostrar
SFX Va ostrar óstren/XxV1V2 ostrar
SFX Va ostrar óstran/XxV1V2 ostrar
SFX Va otar ótes/XxV7V8 otar
SFX Va otar óta/XxV1V2 otar
SFX Va otar óten/XxV1V2 otar
SFX Va otar ótan/XxV1V2 otar
SFX Va otiar óties/XxV7V8 otiar
SFX Va otiar ótia/XxV1V2 otiar
SFX Va otiar ótien/XxV1V2 otiar
SFX Va otiar ótian/XxV1V2 otiar
SFX Va otrar ótres/XxV7V8 otrar
SFX Va otrar ótra/XxV1V2 otrar
SFX Va otrar ótren/XxV1V2 otrar
SFX Va otrar ótran/XxV1V2 otrar
SFX Va otriar ótries/XxV7V8 otriar
SFX Va otriar ótria/XxV1V2 otriar
SFX Va otriar ótrien/XxV1V2 otriar
SFX Va otriar ótrian/XxV1V2 otriar
SFX Va oucar óuques/XxV7V8 oucar
SFX Va oucar óuca/XxV1V2 oucar
SFX Va oucar óuquen/XxV1V2 oucar
SFX Va oucar óucan/XxV1V2 oucar
SFX Va ouchar óuches/XxV7V8 ouchar
SFX Va ouchar óucha/XxV1V2 ouchar
SFX Va ouchar óuchen/XxV1V2 ouchar
SFX Va ouchar óuchan/XxV1V2 ouchar
SFX Va oudar óudes/XxV7V8 oudar
SFX Va oudar óuda/XxV1V2 oudar
SFX Va oudar óuden/XxV1V2 oudar
SFX Va oudar óudan/XxV1V2 oudar
SFX Va ounar óunes/XxV7V8 ounar
SFX Va ounar óuna/XxV1V2 ounar
SFX Va ounar óunen/XxV1V2 ounar
SFX Va ounar óunan/XxV1V2 ounar
SFX Va ouzar óuces/XxV7V8 ouzar
SFX Va ouzar óuza/XxV1V2 ouzar
SFX Va ouzar óucen/XxV1V2 ouzar
SFX Va ouzar óuzan/XxV1V2 ouzar
SFX Va ovar óves/XxV7V8 ovar
SFX Va ovar óva/XxV1V2 ovar
SFX Va ovar óven/XxV1V2 ovar
SFX Va ovar óvan/XxV1V2 ovar
SFX Va oviar óvies/XxV7V8 oviar
SFX Va oviar óvia/XxV1V2 oviar
SFX Va oviar óvien/XxV1V2 oviar
SFX Va oviar óvian/XxV1V2 oviar
SFX Va oxar óxes/XxV7V8 oxar
SFX Va oxar óxa/XxV1V2 oxar
SFX Va oxar óxen/XxV1V2 oxar
SFX Va oxar óxan/XxV1V2 oxar
SFX Va oyar óyes/XxV7V8 oyar
SFX Va oyar óya/XxV1V2 oyar
SFX Va oyar óyen/XxV1V2 oyar
SFX Va oyar óyan/XxV1V2 oyar
SFX Va ozar óces/XxV7V8 ozar
SFX Va ozar óza/XxV1V2 ozar
SFX Va ozar ócen/XxV1V2 ozar
SFX Va ozar ózan/XxV1V2 ozar
SFX Va ozcar ózques/XxV7V8 ozcar
SFX Va ozcar ózca/XxV1V2 ozcar
SFX Va ozcar ózquen/XxV1V2 ozcar
SFX Va ozcar ózcan/XxV1V2 ozcar
SFX Va oñar óñes/XxV7V8 oñar
SFX Va oñar óña/XxV1V2 oñar
SFX Va oñar óñen/XxV1V2 oñar
SFX Va oñar óñan/XxV1V2 oñar
SFX Va uar úes/XxV7V8 uar
SFX Va uar úa/XxV1V2 uar
SFX Va uar úen/XxV1V2 uar
SFX Va uar úan/XxV1V2 uar
SFX Va ubar úbes/XxV7V8 ubar
SFX Va ubar úba/XxV1V2 ubar
SFX Va ubar úben/XxV1V2 ubar
SFX Va ubar úban/XxV1V2 ubar
SFX Va ubiar úbies/XxV7V8 ubiar
SFX Va ubiar úbia/XxV1V2 ubiar
SFX Va ubiar úbien/XxV1V2 ubiar
SFX Va ubiar úbian/XxV1V2 ubiar
SFX Va ublar úbles/XxV7V8 ublar
SFX Va ublar úbla/XxV1V2 ublar
SFX Va ublar úblen/XxV1V2 ublar
SFX Va ublar úblan/XxV1V2 ublar
SFX Va ubrar úbres/XxV7V8 ubrar
SFX Va ubrar úbra/XxV1V2 ubrar
SFX Va ubrar úbren/XxV1V2 ubrar
SFX Va ubrar úbran/XxV1V2 ubrar
SFX Va ucar úques/XxV7V8 ucar
SFX Va ucar úca/XxV1V2 ucar
SFX Va ucar úquen/XxV1V2 ucar
SFX Va ucar úcan/XxV1V2 ucar
SFX Va uchar úches/XxV7V8 uchar
SFX Va uchar úcha/XxV1V2 uchar
SFX Va uchar úchen/XxV1V2 uchar
SFX Va uchar úchan/XxV1V2 uchar
SFX Va uciar úcies/XxV7V8 uciar
SFX Va uciar úcia/XxV1V2 uciar
SFX Va uciar úcien/XxV1V2 uciar
SFX Va uciar úcian/XxV1V2 uciar
SFX Va uclar úcles/XxV7V8 uclar
SFX Va uclar úcla/XxV1V2 uclar
SFX Va uclar úclen/XxV1V2 uclar
SFX Va uclar úclan/XxV1V2 uclar
SFX Va ucrar úcres/XxV7V8 ucrar
SFX Va ucrar úcra/XxV1V2 ucrar
SFX Va ucrar úcren/XxV1V2 ucrar
SFX Va ucrar úcran/XxV1V2 ucrar
SFX Va udar údes/XxV7V8 udar
SFX Va udar úda/XxV1V2 udar
SFX Va udar úden/XxV1V2 udar
SFX Va udar údan/XxV1V2 udar
SFX Va udiar údies/XxV7V8 udiar
SFX Va udiar údia/XxV1V2 udiar
SFX Va udiar údien/XxV1V2 udiar
SFX Va udiar údian/XxV1V2 udiar
SFX Va ufar úfes/XxV7V8 ufar
SFX Va ufar úfa/XxV1V2 ufar
SFX Va ufar úfen/XxV1V2 ufar
SFX Va ufar úfan/XxV1V2 ufar
SFX Va ugar úgues/XxV7V8 ugar
SFX Va ugar úga/XxV1V2 ugar
SFX Va ugar úguen/XxV1V2 ugar
SFX Va ugar úgan/XxV1V2 ugar
SFX Va ugnar úgnes/XxV7V8 ugnar
SFX Va ugnar úgna/XxV1V2 ugnar
SFX Va ugnar úgnen/XxV1V2 ugnar
SFX Va ugnar úgnan/XxV1V2 ugnar
SFX Va uiar es/XxV7V8 uiar
SFX Va uiar a/XxV1V2 uiar
SFX Va uiar en/XxV1V2 uiar
SFX Va uiar an/XxV1V2 uiar
SFX Va ular úles/XxV7V8 ular
SFX Va ular úla/XxV1V2 ular
SFX Va ular úlen/XxV1V2 ular
SFX Va ular úlan/XxV1V2 ular
SFX Va ulcar úlques/XxV7V8 ulcar
SFX Va ulcar úlca/XxV1V2 ulcar
SFX Va ulcar úlquen/XxV1V2 ulcar
SFX Va ulcar úlcan/XxV1V2 ulcar
SFX Va uldar úldes/XxV7V8 uldar
SFX Va uldar úlda/XxV1V2 uldar
SFX Va uldar úlden/XxV1V2 uldar
SFX Va uldar úldan/XxV1V2 uldar
SFX Va ulgar úlgues/XxV7V8 ulgar
SFX Va ulgar úlga/XxV1V2 ulgar
SFX Va ulgar úlguen/XxV1V2 ulgar
SFX Va ulgar úlgan/XxV1V2 ulgar
SFX Va uliar úlies/XxV7V8 uliar
SFX Va uliar úlia/XxV1V2 uliar
SFX Va uliar úlien/XxV1V2 uliar
SFX Va uliar úlian/XxV1V2 uliar
SFX Va ullar úlles/XxV7V8 ullar
SFX Va ullar úlla/XxV1V2 ullar
SFX Va ullar úllen/XxV1V2 ullar
SFX Va ullar úllan/XxV1V2 ullar
SFX Va ulpar úlpes/XxV7V8 ulpar
SFX Va ulpar úlpa/XxV1V2 ulpar
SFX Va ulpar úlpen/XxV1V2 ulpar
SFX Va ulpar úlpan/XxV1V2 ulpar
SFX Va ulpiar úlpies/XxV7V8 ulpiar
SFX Va ulpiar úlpia/XxV1V2 ulpiar
SFX Va ulpiar úlpien/XxV1V2 ulpiar
SFX Va ulpiar úlpian/XxV1V2 ulpiar
