src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abastar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ablagar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aboronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abundar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acaldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acaroñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aceitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
achochar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acogomellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acontinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acostazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aculiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adenterar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aferventar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afogonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
africanizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aganchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agulgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alarmar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alertar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allongar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amanecer/VtSmGaYsVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amenorgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amortiguar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aneguyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apalancar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apebidar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apolizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apuntar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrabonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrecimar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arreyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aruñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
asordar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atartallar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atontar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atroncar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aveyecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
azocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
balar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bebecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bravatiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
calabexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
canonizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
carrular/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chafar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chispiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cisgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
comencipiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
congraciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
coquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cuartiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
decayer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
derrocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desagafar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desapilancar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desaverar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desconxestionar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desencaxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desenroscar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desguarnir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
despeñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dexenerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dosificar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embarrocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embruyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emparzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empitirriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encarniar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encimentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encuenyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfilerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engaramentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engriñonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enllotar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enringlar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entalonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entortoriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enturullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enzafarnar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbaratar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbrengar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escalabrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escaramicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escastrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escolatriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escotrexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escuyapar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfolleyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgarabuyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esguebar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmanganiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmorgullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espansionar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espublizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estarazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estornucir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estronciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esñarbasar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fartar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
flexonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
frañer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
galmiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
golifatiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
guillotinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
imperar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
intercambiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llaminar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llimir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
magnetizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mariar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
mentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
morcar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
narenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
oficializar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
palmetiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
patinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pescar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
planchar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
prefixar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
psicoanalizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ramplar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rebaxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reconcentrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reforciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
remellar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
repostiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
resquilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
revivir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
roldar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
salmodiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
significar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
solidarizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
soscribir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sutruñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tascuxir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tisoriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tramburriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trespapelar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
turnar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
velarizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xagüetar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xoldrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zarpar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
